Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1021.
do enact as follows:AB1021,11Section 1. 29.016 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB1021,2,6229.016 (4) If the department establishes a committee that includes external 3partner groups or members of the public and that advises the department on issues 4relating to elk, the department shall ensure that the committee has a member from 5a partner group or the general public that represents the interests of persons 6experiencing elk damage on agricultural lands. AB1021,27Section 2. 29.885 (3) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB1021,2,10829.885 (3) (e) Notwithstanding par. (a), the department shall remove elk 9causing damage to property no later than 48 hours after receiving notice from a 10person who owns, leases, or occupies property on which an elk is causing damage.AB1021,311Section 3. 29.889 (7m) (au) of the statutes is created to read:AB1021,2,141229.889 (7m) (au) Exemption; damage caused by elk. The requirement to allow 13hunting under par. (a) does not apply to a person seeking wildlife damage 14abatement assistance or wildlife damage claim payments for damage caused by elk.AB1021,2,1515